Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 1 General Provisions
21-1-402. Restrictions on other employment.

Subject to any restriction or condition prescribed by the Arkansas Constitution and except as provided under subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) of this section and subsection (f) of this section, and unless the person resigns before entering into the employment, a person elected to a constitutional office, after being elected to the constitutional office and during the term for which elected, shall not enter into employment with:

Any state agency;

Any public school district of this state in a noncertified position;

Any vocational education school funded by the state; or

Any education service cooperative.

A constitutional officer who was employed by a state agency, a public school district of this state in a licensed or nonlicensed position, a state-supported vocational education school, an education service cooperative, or a state-supported college or university and who receives the prior approval of the Joint Budget Committee during a legislative session or the Legislative Council between legislative sessions, and the Governor, may:

Transfer employment to or become reemployed by another state agency, public school district of this state, state-supported vocational education school, an educational service cooperative, or a state-supported college or university;

Change positions under his or her current employer; or

Upon retirement from a state agency, public school district of this state, state-supported vocational education school, an education service cooperative, or a state-supported college or university, enter into part-time or temporary employment with a state agency, public school district of this state, state-supported vocational education school, an educational service cooperative, or a state-supported college or university.

Employment under this subdivision (a)(2) shall not be approved if the employment will violate §§ 19-11-701 — 19-11-709.

If a constitutional officer is credentialed or certified as a tutor, teacher, professor, or adjunct professor, he or she is not prohibited from employment as a tutor, teacher, professor, or adjunct professor with a public school district, educational service cooperative, state-supported vocational education school, or state-supported college or university in this state.

Subject to any restriction or condition prescribed by the Arkansas Constitution, any constitutional officer who was employed by a state agency prior to being elected a constitutional officer may continue the employment, but the employment shall not thereafter be reclassified unless it is the result of a general reclassification affecting all positions of the class and grade equally, nor shall the constitutional officer receive any pay increase for that employment other than the cost-of-living increases authorized by the General Assembly without the prior approval of the Joint Budget Committee during a legislative session, the Legislative Council between legislative sessions, and the Governor.

No person whose spouse is elected to a constitutional office may, after the spouse is elected to the constitutional office and during the term for which the spouse is elected, enter into employment with any state agency without the prior approval of the Joint Budget Committee during a legislative session, the Legislative Council between legislative sessions, and the Governor.

This subchapter does not prohibit the spouse of any constitutional officer from being elected and serving in an elected office or from being appointed to fill the vacancy in any elected office.

Any person who was employed by a state agency prior to the person's spouse being elected a constitutional officer and any person who entered into employment with a state agency during the spouse's service as a constitutional officer is subject to the following:

The person's position shall not thereafter be reclassified unless it is the result of a general reclassification affecting all positions of the class and grade equally nor shall the person, while the spouse serves as a constitutional officer or within two (2) years after the spouse leaves office, be promoted or transferred without the prior approval of the Joint Budget Committee during a legislative session, the Legislative Council between legislative sessions, and the Governor; and

The person shall not receive any pay increase in excess of fifteen percent (15%) without the prior approval of the Joint Budget Committee during a legislative session, the Legislative Council between legislative sessions, and the Governor.

A former member of the General Assembly and his or her spouse shall not be eligible to be employed by any state agency within twenty-four (24) months after the member leaves office in any job or position that:

Was newly created by legislative action within the twenty-four (24) months prior to the member's leaving office; or

Had a maximum salary level increase of more than fifteen percent (15%) authorized by legislative action within the twenty-four (24) months prior to the member's leaving office.

A former member of the General Assembly shall not take the following actions until two (2) years after the expiration of the term of office for which he or she was elected:

Register as a lobbyist under § 21-8-601 et seq.; or

Enter into employment as the director of an:

Educational cooperative under The Public School Educational Cooperative Act of 1981, § 6-13-901 et seq.; or

Area agency on aging.

Except as provided in subdivision (f)(2)(B) of this section, subdivision (f)(1) of this section applies to a person elected or reelected to the General Assembly on or after November 6, 2018.

Subdivision (f)(1)(A) of this section shall apply to a person elected or reelected to the General Assembly on or after November 4, 2014.

The Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Attorney General, Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, and Commissioner of State Lands are not eligible to be registered as lobbyists under § 21-8-601 et seq. until one (1) year after the expiration of the respective terms of office to which they were elected.

An individual employed in the office of the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Attorney General, Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, or Commissioner of State Lands is not eligible to be registered as a lobbyist under § 21-8-601 et seq. until one (1) year after the expiration of the individual's employment in that office.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 1398, § 2, provided: “The provisions of the Arkansas Code added by this act are nonseverable. In the event any part of the provisions of the Arkansas Code added by this act, including but not limited to the provisions requiring prior approval of the Joint Budget Committee or Legislative Counsel and the Governor, are found to be unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the amendments to Arkansas Code §21-1-402 contained in this act shall be null and void and Arkansas Code §21-1-402 before amendment by this act shall remain in full force and effect.”

Amendments. The 2003 amendment added (f).

The 2005 amendment deleted (a)(1)(E), and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2009 amendment inserted “and except as provided under subdivision (a)(2) of this section” in (a)(1); inserted (a)(2) and redesignated former (a)(2) as (a)(3).

The 2011 amendment by identical acts Nos. 48 and 71 added (f)(2); and inserted“one (1) year after” in (f)(1).

The 2013 amendment added (g) and (h).

The 2015 amendment substituted “two (2) years” for “one (1) year” in (f)(1); and substituted “November 4, 2014” for “July 27, 2011” in (f)(2).

The 2017 amendment substituted “subdivisions (a)(2) and (3)” for “subdivision (a)(2)” in (a)(1); inserted present (a)(3) and redesignated former (a)(3) as (a)(4); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment inserted “and subsection (f) of this section” in the introductory language of (a)(1); and rewrote (f).

The lease agreement, contract, or grant is awarded as a result of competitive bidding or a request for proposal and the constitutional officer played no role, directly or indirectly, in the administrative:

Determination of specifications for the bid or request for proposal;

Evaluation or consideration of the bid or request for proposal; or

Decision to accept the bid or request for proposal; or

If competitive bidding or a request for proposal was not required by law, the lease agreement, contract, or grant has received the prior approval of:

The Joint Budget Committee during legislative sessions or the Legislative Council between legislative sessions; and

The Governor.

No constitutional officer may receive any subgrant, subcontract, or assignment of any lease with a state agency unless the constitutional officer:

The Joint Budget Committee during legislative sessions or the Legislative Council between legislative sessions; and

The Governor.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment rewrote (c).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (a).

(1)Constitutional officers shall not enter into professional and consultant services contracts with state agencies subject to §§ 19-11-1001 — 19-11-1011.

The restrictions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section also apply to spouses of constitutional officers and to any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or any other legal entity of which a constitutional officer or the constitutional officer's spouse has an ownership interest of at least ten percent (10%).

If a constitutional officer, a constitutional officer's spouse, or an entity listed in subsection (d) of this section becomes the recipient of a grant, contract, or lease through competitive bidding or a request for proposal, the awarding state agency shall give written notice of the selection of the constitutional officer, constitutional officer's spouse, or entity to:

Grants, contracts, and leases entered into prior to the person's becoming a constitutional officer are not subject to the provisions of this section, but renewals and extensions of those grants, contracts, and leases are subject to the provisions of this section.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to promulgate and implement any necessary rules or policies to ensure compliance with this subchapter subject to the prior review and approval of the Joint Budget Committee during legislative sessions and the Legislative Council between legislative sessions.

All disclosure statements and other information required to be furnished by constitutional officers and their spouses shall be certified by the constitutional officer or spouse under penalty of perjury.

Any knowing violation of this subchapter is a Class D felony.

The violation of any rule or policy promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration under this subchapter or the failure of a constitutional officer or spouse of a constitutional officer to disclose his or her interest in any contract, grant, or lease agreement or in any subcontract, subgrant, or assignment of lease as required by this subchapter or as required by any rule or policy of the department shall be grounds for voiding the contract, grant, lease agreement, subcontract, subgrant, or lease assignment, and the constitutional officer or spouse may be required to refund any moneys received thereunder.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (b) twice.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 34, § 2; 2003, No. 1453, § 1; 2005, No. 1962, § 91; 2009, No. 1398, § 1; 2011, No. 48, §
2; 2011, No. 71, §
2; 2013, No. 486, § 1; 2015, No. 1280, § 11; 2017, No. 961, § 1; 2019, No. 661, §§ 2, 3.

21-1-403. Restrictions on lease agreements, contracts, and grants.

No constitutional officer may enter into any lease agreement, contract, or grant with any state agency unless:

Is disclosed as a subgrantee or subcontractor in the competitive bid or request for proposal; or

If competitive bidding or a request for proposal was not required by law, receives prior approval from:

Any professional and consultant services contracts obtained by constitutional officers or their spouses with any state agency exempt from §§19-11-1001 —19-11-1011 must receive prior review of the Joint Budget Committee during legislative sessions and the Legislative Council between legislative sessions.

The Joint Budget Committee during legislative sessions or the Legislative Council between legislative sessions; and

The Governor.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 34, § 3; 2003, No. 1315, § 14.

21-1-404. Rules — Disclosure statement.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 34, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 2314; 2019, No. 910, § 3489.

21-1-405. Violations.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 34, § 5; Acts 2007, No. 827, § 172; 2019, No. 315, § 2315.

21-1-406. Venue for violation proceedings.

The venue for the judicial proceedings for violating §21-1-405(a) shall be in the county of the defendant's domicile.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 34, § 6.

21-1-407. Employment by state agency.

A person whose spouse is elected to a constitutional office may be employed by a state agency without the approval of the employment required by §21-1-402(b) if the person's entry salary does not exceed the amount prescribed by Level 4 of Grade 13 of the state compensation plan found in §21-5-209.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 34, § 7.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The reference in this section to “Level 4 of Grade 13” is obsolete.The compensation plan under the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §21-5-201 et seq., was completely revised by Acts 2005, No. 2198.

21-1-408. Investigation of violations.

The Arkansas Ethics Commission is authorized to investigate any complaints or allegations of violations of the provisions of this subchapter and to make findings thereon.

In the investigation of such matters, the commission is specifically given all authority and powers as granted to it under the provisions of §§ 7-6-217 and 7-6-218.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 34, § 8.

Subchapter 5

— Public Employees' Political Freedom Act of 1999

21-1-501. Title.

This subchapter shall create the “Public Employees' Political Freedom Act of 1999”.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 658, § 1.

21-1-502. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Elected public official” means the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, Attorney General, Commissioner of State Lands, a member of the Senate, and a member of the House of Representatives;

“Public employee” means any person providing services for the State of Arkansas, a county, a municipal corporation, or any other political subdivision of this state for which compensation is paid; and

“Public employer” means the State of Arkansas and each political subdivision of the State of Arkansas, as defined in § 21-5-603.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted former (b) and the former subsection (a) designation; inserted “any” in present (2); and substituted “21-5-603” for “21-5-603(b)” in present (3).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 658, § 2; 2005, No. 1962, § 92.

21-1-503. Employer not to penalize employee's political activity.

A public employee shall not be prohibited from communicating with an elected public official concerning a matter related to the public employee's job, except for a matter exempted under § 25-19-105.

A public employee shall not be prohibited from exercising a right or privilege under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

It shall be unlawful for any public employer to discipline, to threaten to discipline, to reprimand either orally or in writing, to place any notation in a public employee's personnel file disciplining or reprimanding the public employee, or to otherwise discriminate against a public employee because the public employee exercised the right to communicate with an elected public official or exercised a right or privilege under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., as granted under this subchapter.

A public employer shall not be prohibited from disciplining a public employee who has intentionally made an untrue allegation to an elected public official concerning a matter related to the public employee's job.

Any person willfully violating a provision of this subchapter shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted present (a); redesignated former (a) as present (b)(1); inserted present (b)(2); redesignated former (b) as present (c); deleted former (c); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment inserted (b) and redesignated the subsequent subsections accordingly.

The 2015 amendment inserted “or exercised a right or privilege under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.” in (c)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2005, No. 2190, § 24: Apr. 13, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the services of the county boards of education are no longer needed by the school districts; that there will be no funding available for the operation of the county boards of education; and that this act is immediately necessary because county boards of education need sufficient authority to transfer functions, duties, and records prior the end of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 658, § 3; 2005, No. 1962, § 93; 2009, No. 771, § 1; 2015, No. 102, § 1.

Subchapter 6

— Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act

21-1-601. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act”.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1523, § 1.

21-1-602. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Adverse action” means to discharge, threaten, or otherwise discriminate or retaliate against a public employee in any manner that affects the employee's employment, including compensation, job location, rights, immunities, promotions, or privileges;

“Appropriate authority” means:

A state, county, or municipal government department, agency, or organization having jurisdiction over criminal law enforcement, regulatory violations, professional conduct or ethics, or waste; or

A member, officer, agent, investigator, auditor, representative, or supervisory employee of the body, agency, or organization.

“Appropriate authority” includes, but is not limited to, the office of the Attorney General, the office of the Auditor of State, the Arkansas Ethics Commission, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and Arkansas Legislative Audit, and the offices of the various prosecuting attorneys having the power and duty to investigate criminal law enforcement, regulatory violations, professional conduct or ethics, or waste;

“Communicate” means to give a verbal or written report to an appropriate authority;

“Public employee” means a person who performs a full or part-time service for wages, salary, or other remuneration for a public employer.

“Public employee” includes without limitation a state employee under § 21-1-610;

“Public employer” means any of the following:

An agency, department, board, commission, division, office, bureau, council, authority, or other instrumentality of the State of Arkansas, including the offices of the various Arkansas elected constitutional officers and the General Assembly and its agencies, bureaus, and divisions;

A state-supported college, university, technical college, community college, or other institution of higher education or department, division, or agency of a state institution of higher education;

The Supreme Court, the Court of Appeals, the Administrative Office of the Courts, the circuit courts, and prosecuting attorneys' offices;

An office, department, commission, council, agency, board, bureau, committee, corporation, or other instrumentality of a county government or a municipality or a district court, a county subordinate service district, a municipally owned utility, or a regional or joint governing body of one (1) or more counties or municipalities; or

A public school district, school, or an office or department of a public school district in Arkansas;

“Violation” means an infraction or a breach which is not of a merely technical or minimal nature of a state statute or rule, of a political subdivision ordinance or regulation, or of a code of conduct or code of ethics designed to protect the interest of the public or a public employer;

“Waste” means a public employer's conduct or omissions which result in substantial abuse, misuse, destruction, or loss of public funds, property, or manpower belonging to or derived from the state or local political subdivision's resources; and

“Whistle-blower” means a person who witnesses or has evidence of a waste or violation while employed with a public employer and who communicates in good faith or testifies to the waste or violation, verbally or in writing, to one of the employee's superiors, to an agent of the public employer, or to an appropriate authority, provided that the communication is made prior to any adverse action by the employer.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted “county board of education or a” in (5)(E) and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (4).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (6).

Because the circuit court previously ruled that the employee violated multiple rules and policies, it was clear that his termination was the result of that misconduct and not related to any communication between the employee and the city administrator; that previous ruling did, in fact, establish the city's affirmative defense to the whistle-blower claim.Barrows v. City of Fort Smith, 2010 Ark. 73, 360 S.W.3d 117 (2010).

There were no undisputed facts that warranted proceeding to a jury trial; the circuit court determined as a matter of law that the city had an affirmative defense to the employee's whistle-blower claim in that his termination was the result of his violating departmental rules and policies. As the circuit court reasoned, the employee should not be allowed to force the city to prove that misconduct yet again.Barrows v. City of Fort Smith, 2010 Ark. 73, 360 S.W.3d 117 (2010).

There was sufficient evidence that the employee was a public employee, because the employee was a person, and it was undisputed that he performed part-time services in exchange for wages from the Arkansas Department of Career Education, a public employer.State v. Means, 2013 Ark. 173, 426 S.W.3d 922 (2013).

In the nurse's action under the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act, the trial court did not err by denying the motion for summary judgment of the Administrator of the Arkansas State Hospital and its employee based on sovereign immunity because the suit against the Administrator in his official capacity was in effect a suit against a public employer for which sovereign immunity was waived by this section.Smith v. Daniel, 2014 Ark. 519, 452 S.W.3d 575 (2014).

Per the holding in Board of Trustees v. Andrews, 2018 Ark. 12, to the extent the legislature subjected the State to liability in the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act, §21-1-601 et seq., it is prohibited by Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 20, and the circuit court erred when it denied defendant’s motion for judgment on the pleadings based on sovereign immunity.The General Assembly’s choice to abrogate sovereign immunity in the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act is prohibited by the Arkansas Constitution.Ark. Cmty. Corr. v. Barnes, 2018 Ark. 122, 542 S.W.3d 841 (2018).

Law professor's Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act (AWBA) individual-capacity claims against state university officials were properly dismissed because the AWBA does not provide for suits against individuals.Steinbuch v. Univ. of Ark., 2019 Ark. 356, 589 S.W.3d 350 (2019).

Because terminated county employee's actions of reporting alleged misdeeds to quorum court members, sitting as a grievance committee, was reporting to the “appropriate authorities,” under subdivision (2)(A)(ii) of this section, evidence supporting terminated employee's claim under the Whistle-Blower Act created a question of fact and, thus, it was error for the trial court to have granted the county's motion for a directed verdict. Crawford County v. Jones, 365 Ark. 585, 232 S.W.3d 433 (2006).

Bullying and harassment do not amount to either a waste of public funds or a violation of the law for purposes of the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act. Bales v. City of Fort Smith, 2016 Ark. App. 491 (2016) (substituted op. on reh'g).

Cited: Hollis v. Fayetteville Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2015 Ark. App. 544, 473 S.W.3d 45 (2015).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1523, § 2; 2005, No. 2190, § 21; 2013, No. 211, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2316.